Utah statutes.
54-15-107.   Application to out-of-state electrical corporation.
An electrical corporation with fewer than 5,000 customers in this state that
is headquartered in another state is considered to be in compliance with this
chapter if the electrical corporation offers net metering to its customers in
Utah in accordance with a tariff, schedule, or other requirement of the
appropriate authority in the state in which the electrical corporation's
headquarters are located.
